lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4572 Y 46
SFX 4572 u u . 222
SFX 4572 u udu . 222
SFX 4572 u iejų . 223
SFX 4572 u iem . 224
SFX 4572 u iems . 225
SFX 4572 u u . 226
SFX 4572 u iem . 227
SFX 4572 u iejuose . 228
SFX 4572 u iejuos . 229
SFX 4572 u u . 230
SFX 4572 u i . 231
SFX 4572 u idvi . 231
SFX 4572 u iejų . 232
SFX 4572 u iem . 233
SFX 4572 u iems . 234
SFX 4572 u i . 235
SFX 4572 u iem . 236
SFX 4572 u iemis . 237
SFX 4572 u iejomis . 237
SFX 4572 u iejose . 238
SFX 4572 u i . 239
SFX 4572 u eji . 170
SFX 4572 u ejų . 171
SFX 4572 u ejiems . 172
SFX 4572 u ejiem . 173
SFX 4572 u ejus . 174
SFX 4572 u ejais . 175
SFX 4572 u ejuose . 176
SFX 4572 u ejuos . 177
SFX 4572 u eji . 178
SFX 4572 u ejos . 179
SFX 4572 u ejų . 180
SFX 4572 u ejoms . 181
SFX 4572 u ejom . 182
SFX 4572 u ejas . 183
SFX 4572 u ejomis . 184
SFX 4572 u ejom . 185
SFX 4572 u ejose . 186
SFX 4572 u ejos . 187
SFX 4572 u ejetas . 240
SFX 4572 u ejeto . 241
SFX 4572 u ejetui . 242
SFX 4572 u ejetą . 243
SFX 4572 u ejetu . 244
SFX 4572 u ejete . 245
SFX 4572 u ejete . 246

SFX 4582 Y 5
SFX 4582 u iejuosna . 247
SFX 4582 u iejosna . 248
SFX 4582 u ejuosna . 188
SFX 4582 u ejosna . 189
SFX 4582 u ejetan . 249

SFX 4623 Y 49
SFX 4623 is is dalis 38
SFX 4623 is io dalis 39
SFX 4623 is iui dalis 42
SFX 4623 is į dalis 43
SFX 4623 is iu dalis 44
SFX 4623 is yje dalis 45
SFX 4623 is y dalis 87
SFX 4623 is iai dalis 40
SFX 4623 is ių dalis 41
SFX 4623 is iams dalis 46
SFX 4623 is iam dalis 47
SFX 4623 is ius dalis 48
SFX 4623 is iais dalis 49
SFX 4623 is iuose dalis 50
SFX 4623 is iuos dalis 51
SFX 4623 ė ė ė 94
SFX 4623 ė ės ė 95
SFX 4623 ė ei ė 98
SFX 4623 ė ę ė 99
SFX 4623 ė e ė 100
SFX 4623 ė ėje ė 101
SFX 4623 ė ėj ė 102
SFX 4623 ė ės ė 96
SFX 4623 ė ių ė 97
SFX 4623 ė ėms ė 103
SFX 4623 ė ėm ė 104
SFX 4623 ė es ė 105
SFX 4623 ė ėmis ė 106
SFX 4623 ė ėm ė 107
SFX 4623 ė ėse ė 108
SFX 4623 is is tis 38
SFX 4623 tis čio tis 39
SFX 4623 tis čiui tis 42
SFX 4623 is į tis 43
SFX 4623 tis čiu tis 44
SFX 4623 is yje tis 45
SFX 4623 is y tis 87
SFX 4623 tis čiai tis 40
SFX 4623 tis čių tis 41
SFX 4623 tis čiams tis 46
SFX 4623 tis čiam tis 47
SFX 4623 tis čius tis 48
SFX 4623 tis čiais tis 49
SFX 4623 tis čiuose tis 50
SFX 4623 tis čiuos tis 51
SFX 4623 o o o 39
SFX 4623 o ų o 41
SFX 4623 o os o 95
SFX 4623 o ų o 97

SFX 4630 Y 6
SFX 4630 is i dalis 52
SFX 4630 is iai dalis 57
SFX 4630 ė e ė 109
SFX 4630 ė ės ė 110
SFX 4630 is i tis 52
SFX 4630 tis čiai tis 57

SFX 4631 Y 6
SFX 4631 is in dalis 54
SFX 4631 is iuosna dalis 55
SFX 4631 ė ėn ė 112
SFX 4631 ė ėsna ė 113
SFX 4631 is in tis 54
SFX 4631 tis čiuosna tis 55

SFX 4632 Y 3
SFX 4632 is iu dalis 56
SFX 4632 ė i ė 114
SFX 4632 tis čiu tis 56

SFX 4687 Y 34
SFX 4687 as as . 38
SFX 4687 as o . 39
SFX 4687 as am . 42
SFX 4687 as ą . 43
SFX 4687 as u . 44
SFX 4687 as ame . 45
SFX 4687 as am . 87
SFX 4687 as as . 52
SFX 4687 as i . 40
SFX 4687 as ų . 41
SFX 4687 as iems . 46
SFX 4687 as iem . 47
SFX 4687 as us . 48
SFX 4687 as ais . 49
SFX 4687 as uose . 50
SFX 4687 as uos . 51
SFX 4687 as i . 57
SFX 4687 as a . 94
SFX 4687 as os . 95
SFX 4687 as ai . 98
SFX 4687 as ą . 99
SFX 4687 as a . 100
SFX 4687 as oje . 101
SFX 4687 as oj . 102
SFX 4687 as a . 109
SFX 4687 as os . 96
SFX 4687 as ų . 97
SFX 4687 as oms . 103
SFX 4687 as om . 104
SFX 4687 as as . 105
SFX 4687 as omis . 106
SFX 4687 as om . 107
SFX 4687 as ose . 108
SFX 4687 as os . 110

SFX 4695 Y 4
SFX 4695 as an . 54
SFX 4695 as uosna . 55
SFX 4695 as on . 112
SFX 4695 as osna . 113

SFX 4696 Y 2
SFX 4696 as u . 56
SFX 4696 as i . 114

SFX 4727 Y 1
SFX 4727 as a . 147

SFX 4728 Y 1
SFX 4728 as asis/531 . 151

SFX 4729 Y 1
SFX 4729 as asis/532 . 151

SFX 4730 Y 1
SFX 4730 as asis/533 . 151

SFX 4731 Y 34
SFX 4731 as as . 38
SFX 4731 as o . 39
SFX 4731 as am . 42
SFX 4731 as ą . 43
SFX 4731 as u . 44
SFX 4731 as ame . 45
SFX 4731 as am . 87
SFX 4731 as as . 52
SFX 4731 čias ti . 40
SFX 4731 as ų . 41
SFX 4731 čias tiems . 46
SFX 4731 čias tiem . 47
SFX 4731 as us . 48
SFX 4731 as ais . 49
SFX 4731 as uose . 50
SFX 4731 as uos . 51
SFX 4731 čias ti . 57
SFX 4731 as a . 94
SFX 4731 as os . 95
SFX 4731 as ai . 98
SFX 4731 as ą . 99
SFX 4731 as a . 100
SFX 4731 as oje . 101
SFX 4731 as oj . 102
SFX 4731 as a . 109
SFX 4731 as os . 96
SFX 4731 as ų . 97
SFX 4731 as oms . 103
SFX 4731 as om . 104
SFX 4731 as as . 105
SFX 4731 as omis . 106
SFX 4731 as om . 107
SFX 4731 as ose . 108
SFX 4731 as os . 110

SFX 4739 Y 4
SFX 4739 as an . 54
SFX 4739 as uosna . 55
SFX 4739 as on . 112
SFX 4739 as osna . 113

SFX 4740 Y 2
SFX 4740 as u . 56
SFX 4740 čias ti . 114

SFX 4771 Y 1
SFX 4771 as a . 147

SFX 4772 Y 1
SFX 4772 as asis/531 . 151

SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 as asis/532 . 151

SFX 4774 Y 1
SFX 4774 as asis/533 . 151

SFX 4775 Y 1
SFX 4775 čias tysis/543 . 151

SFX 4776 Y 34
SFX 4776 as as . 58
SFX 4776 as o . 59
SFX 4776 as am . 60
SFX 4776 as ą . 61
SFX 4776 as u . 62
SFX 4776 as ame . 63
SFX 4776 as am . 88
SFX 4776 as as . 64
SFX 4776 as i . 141
SFX 4776 as ų . 250
SFX 4776 as iems . 145
SFX 4776 as iem . 251
SFX 4776 as us . 142
SFX 4776 as ais . 146
SFX 4776 as uose . 252
SFX 4776 as uos . 253
SFX 4776 as i . 166
SFX 4776 as a . 115
SFX 4776 as os . 116
SFX 4776 as ai . 117
SFX 4776 as ą . 118
SFX 4776 as a . 119
SFX 4776 as oje . 120
SFX 4776 as oj . 121
SFX 4776 as a . 122
SFX 4776 as os . 254
SFX 4776 as ų . 255
SFX 4776 as oms . 256
SFX 4776 as om . 257
SFX 4776 as as . 258
SFX 4776 as omis . 259
SFX 4776 as om . 260
SFX 4776 as ose . 261
SFX 4776 as os . 262

SFX 4784 Y 4
SFX 4784 as an . 66
SFX 4784 as uosna . 263
SFX 4784 as on . 124
SFX 4784 as osna . 264

SFX 4814 Y 1
SFX 4814 as a . 265

SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 as asis/531 . 151

SFX 4816 Y 1
SFX 4816 as asis/532 . 151

SFX 4817 Y 1
SFX 4817 as asis/533 . 151

SFX 4818 Y 34
SFX 4818 aš aš . 266
SFX 4818 aš manęs . 267
SFX 4818 aš mano . 268
SFX 4818 aš man . 269
SFX 4818 aš mane . 270
SFX 4818 aš manimi . 271
SFX 4818 aš manim . 272
SFX 4818 aš manyje . 273
SFX 4818 aš manyj . 274
SFX 4818 aš many . 274
SFX 4818 aš mudu . 275
SFX 4818 aš mudviejų . 276
SFX 4818 aš mudviem . 277
SFX 4818 aš mudviems . 278
SFX 4818 aš mudu . 279
SFX 4818 aš mudviem . 280
SFX 4818 aš mudviejuose . 281
SFX 4818 aš mudviejuos . 282
SFX 4818 aš mudvi . 283
SFX 4818 aš mudviejų . 284
SFX 4818 aš mudviem . 285
SFX 4818 aš mudviems . 286
SFX 4818 aš mudvi . 287
SFX 4818 aš mudviem . 288
SFX 4818 aš mudviejose . 289
SFX 4818 aš mes . 290
SFX 4818 aš mūsų . 291
SFX 4818 aš mūs . 292
SFX 4818 aš mums . 293
SFX 4818 aš mum . 294
SFX 4818 aš mus . 295
SFX 4818 aš mumis . 296
SFX 4818 aš mumyse . 297
SFX 4818 aš mūsuose . 297

SFX 4828 Y 2
SFX 4828 aš manin . 298
SFX 4828 aš mumysna . 299

SFX 4854 Y 33
SFX 4854 tu tu . 266
SFX 4854 tu tavęs . 267
SFX 4854 tu tavo . 268
SFX 4854 tu tau . 269
SFX 4854 tu tave . 270
SFX 4854 tu tavimi . 271
SFX 4854 tu tavim . 272
SFX 4854 tu tavyje . 273
SFX 4854 tu tavyj . 274
SFX 4854 tu tavy . 274
SFX 4854 tu judu . 275
SFX 4854 tu judviejų . 276
SFX 4854 tu judviem . 277
SFX 4854 tu judviems . 278
SFX 4854 tu judu . 279
SFX 4854 tu judviem . 280
SFX 4854 tu judviejuose . 281
SFX 4854 tu judviejuos . 282
SFX 4854 tu judvi . 283
SFX 4854 tu judviejų . 284
SFX 4854 tu judviem . 285
SFX 4854 tu judviems . 286
SFX 4854 tu judvi . 287
SFX 4854 tu judviem . 288
SFX 4854 tu judviejose . 289
SFX 4854 tu jūs . 290
SFX 4854 tu jūsų . 291
SFX 4854 tu jūs . 292
SFX 4854 tu jums . 293
SFX 4854 tu jum . 294
SFX 4854 tu jus . 295
SFX 4854 tu jumis . 296
SFX 4854 tu jumyse . 297

SFX 4864 Y 2
SFX 4864 tu tavin . 298
SFX 4864 tu jumysna . 299

SFX 4889 Y 9
SFX 4889 vęs vęs . 300
SFX 4889 vęs vo . 301
SFX 4889 vęs u . 302
SFX 4889 vęs ve . 303
SFX 4889 vęs vimi . 304
SFX 4889 vęs vim . 305
SFX 4889 vęs vyje . 306
SFX 4889 vęs vyj . 307
SFX 4889 vęs vy . 307

SFX 4898 Y 1
SFX 4898 vęs vin . 308

AF 4687,4695,4727,4728,4729,30001 # 120
AF 4818,4828,30001 # 259
AF 4623,4630,4631,30001 # 263
AF 4776,4784,4814,4815,4816,30001 # 288
AF 4889,4898,30001 # 491
AF 4731,4739,4771,4772,4773,4775,30001 # 504
AF 4854,4864,30001 # 508
