lt_LT.dic
antras/120	24
aš/259	11
aštuntadalis/263	30
aštuntas/120	24
aštuoniasdešimtadalis/263	30
aštuoniasdešimtas/120	24
aštuonioliktadalis/263	30
aštuonioliktas/120	24
bilijonas/288	24
devintadalis/263	30
devintas/120	24
devyniasdešimtadalis/263	30
devyniasdešimtas/120	24
devynioliktadalis/263	30
devynioliktas/120	24
dešimtadalis/263	30
dešimtas/120	24
dešimttūkstantas/288	24
dutūkstantas/288	24
dušimtas/288	24
dvidešimtadalis/263	30
dvidešimtas/120	24
dvyliktadalis/263	30
dvyliktas/120	24
keturiasdešimtadalis/263	30
keturiasdešimtas/120	24
keturiašimtas/288	24
keturioliktadalis/263	30
keturioliktas/120	24
ketvirtadalis/263	30
ketvirtas/120	24
milijardas/288	24
milijonas/288	24
penkiasdešimtadalis/263	30
penkiasdešimtas/120	24
penkiašimtas/288	24
penkioliktadalis/263	30
penkioliktas/120	24
penktadalis/263	30
penktas/120	24
pirmas/120	24
pusantro/263	30
pusaštunto/263	30
pusdevinto/263	30
pusdešimto/263	30
pusketvirto/263	30
puspenkto/263	30
pusseptinto/263	30
pustrečio/263	30
pusšešto/263	30
savęs/491	11
septintadalis/263	30
septintas/120	24
septyniasdešimtadalis/263	30
septyniasdešimtas/120	24
septynioliktadalis/263	30
septynioliktas/120	24
trečdalis/263	30
trečias/504	24
trilijonas/288	24
trisdešimtadalis/263	30
trisdešimtas/120	24
trisšimtas/288	24
trišimtas/288	24
tryliktadalis/263	30
tryliktas/120	24
tu/508	11
tūkstantadalis/263	30
tūkstantas/288	24
vienuoliktadalis/263	30
vienuoliktas/120	24
šešiasdešimtadalis/263	30
šešiasdešimtas/120	24
šešioliktadalis/263	30
šešioliktas/120	24
šeštadalis/263	30
šeštas/120	24
šimtadalis/263	30
šimtas/288	24
